District of Columbia statutes.
7-1201.03

Personal notes.

If a mental health professional makes personal notes regarding a client, such personal notes shall not be maintained as a part of the client’s record of mental health information. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, access to such personal notes shall be strictly and absolutely limited to the mental health professional and shall not be disclosed except to the degree that the personal notes or the information contained therein are needed in litigation brought by the client against the mental health professional on the grounds of professional malpractice or disclosure in violation of this section.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 103, 25 DCR 5055
This section is referenced in § 7-1205.01.
1981 Ed., § 6-2003.
1973 Ed., § 6-1613.